District of Columbia statutes.
35-234

Tokens and tickets; certification of eligibility required.

(a)

Student fare tokens and tickets shall be issued by the Mayor of the District of Columbia only to students who present a certification of eligibility to use the Metrobus Transit System issued by an authorized school official.

(b)

Certifications of eligibility shall be issued only to those students who meet the eligibility requirements imposed by subsection (c) of § 35-233 and shall contain such additional information as the Mayor may require. The Mayor is authorized to verify information contained in certifications of eligibility.

Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-152, § 2, 25 DCR 2534
Sept. 26, 1981, D.C. Law 4-33, § 2(c), 28 DCR 3187
1981 Ed., § 44-218.
1973 Ed., § 44-214.3.